New York, session 2025-2026, A6892.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 24 of the general construction law, as amended by 2 chapter 249 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 24. Public holidays; half-holidays. The term public holiday includes 4 the following days in each year: the first day of January, known as New 5 Year's day; the third Monday of January, known as Dr. Martin Luther 6 King, Jr. day; the twelfth day of February, known as Lincoln's birthday; 7 the third Monday in February, known as Washington's birthday; the last 8 Monday in May, known as Memorial day; the second Sunday in June, known 9 as Flag day; the nineteenth day of June, known as Juneteenth; the fourth 10 day of July, known as Independence day; the second Monday in July, known 11 as Abolition Commemoration day; the first Monday in September, known as 12 Labor day; the second Monday in October, known as Columbus day; the 13 eleventh day of November, known as Veterans' day; the fourth Thursday in 14 November, known as Thanksgiving day; and the twenty-fifth day of Decem- 15 ber, known as Christmas day, and if any of such days except Flag day is 16 Sunday, the next day thereafter; each general election day, and each day 17 appointed by the president of the United States or by the governor of 18 this state as a day of general thanksgiving, general fasting and prayer, 19 or other general religious observances. The term half-holiday includes 20 the period from noon to midnight of each Saturday which is not a public 21 holiday. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 23 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10525-01-5